Hawaii statutes.
§710-1024 Bail jumping in the first degree.
(1) A person commits the offense of bail jumping in the first degree if,
having been released from custody by court order with or without bail, upon
condition that the person will subsequently appear as ordered in connection
with a charge of having committed a felony, the person knowingly fails to
appear as ordered.

(2) Bail jumping in the first degree is a
class C felony. [L 1972, c 9, pt of §1; am L 1993, c 10, §1; am L 2004, c 17,
§1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next